Hawaii statutes.
[§200-32] Fees and charges. (a)
Except for vessels for which fees and charges are provided in subsection (b),
the department shall assess and collect from the owner of each vessel required
to be registered and numbered by section 200-31, the following fees and
charges:

(1) Initial annual registration fee. For the
issuance of an original certificate:

(A) For each vessel less than twenty feet in
length, $13;

(B) For each vessel twenty feet or more in
length, $25; and

(C) For each amphibious vehicle licensed as a
motor vehicle, $15;

(2) Annual certificate renewal fee. For the annual
renewal of a certificate:

(A) For each vessel less than twenty feet in
length, $10;

(B) For each vessel twenty feet or more in
length, $15; and

(C) For each amphibious vehicle licensed as a
motor vehicle, $10;

(3) Reregistration fee. For the reregistration of a
vessel, after a certificate has been canceled or voided, the appropriate amount
provided in paragraph (1);

(4) Transfer fee. For the transfer of a certificate,
$5;

(5) Certificate and registration sticker replacement
fee. For the issuance of a replacement certificate or a replacement set of
vessel registration stickers, $5;

(6) Certificate modification fee. For modifying a
certificate, $5;

(7) Penalty charges for late registration, etc. For
each month or fraction thereof that a registration, renewal, reregistration, or
transfer is delinquent, one-tenth of the appropriate fee shall be added to the
normal fee, and the department may take such other enforcement action it deems
appropriate; and

(8) Exemptions. The department may reasonably
establish, by rules, exemptions from the fees required by this section.

(b) For vessels owned by or operated under the
custody or control of a boat manufacturer or boat dealer, the manufacturer or
dealer shall pay, in lieu of the fees and charges provided for in subsection
(a):

(1) Boat manufacturer and boat dealer annual
certificate fee. For each certificate, a fee of $20;

(2) Annual certificate renewal fee. For the annual
renewal of a certificate, a fee of $15;

(3) Certificate reissuance. For the reissuance of a
certificate after a certificate has been canceled or voided, a fee of $20; and

(4) Certificate and registration sticker replacement
fee. For the replacement of a certificate or registration sticker, a fee of
$5. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next